Utah statutes.
78A-9-102.   Fees for certificate of admission.
The appellate courts shall receive a $50 fee for a certificate of admission as
attorney and counselor, $30 of which shall be retained by the state treasurer
for the benefit of the State Law Library, to be expended by the Judicial
Council.
